Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,117
Improvements; petition; recording.

Whenever a petition for an improvement is filed with a city, the hour, day, month, and year when such petition is filed shall be officially marked upon such petition and such petition shall be recorded in such manner as the city may from time to time provide.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 34, p. 207;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 121.
July 21, 2022